Utah statutes.
11-31-3.   Issuance of bonds -- Registration for offer and sale.

(1)  Any bonds authorized by law to be issued may be issued without regard to the treatment of interest on those bonds for purposes of federal income taxation.

(2) (a)  Any public body authorized to issue bonds may take any actions and enter into any agreements necessary or appropriate to register or qualify the bonds described in this section for offer and sale under the federal or any state's or nation's securities laws and to comply with those laws.

(b)  Those actions and agreements on behalf of the state may be taken and entered into by the commission created under Section 63B-1-201 or by the state treasurer, as appropriate.



Amended by Chapter 12, 2001 General Session

